Alabama, session 2026rs, HB622.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. The Jemison City Council, by resolution, may
authorize the sale or distribution of draft beer by retail
licensees of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board in the City
of Jemison. The authorization shall include the sale of draft
beer for off-premises consumption in a growler, keg, or other
similar container by persons licensed by the board to make
retail sales for off-premises consumption.
Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 1

Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
HB622 Enrolled









________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 31-Mar-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 08-Apr-26 Passed



Page 2